Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Gubernatorial Transition

11.210.
Definition for KRS 11.210 to 11.260.

As used in KRS

11.210

to

11.260

, “Governor-elect” means the person who is the apparent successful candidate for the office of Governor, as ascertained by the Secretary of State following the general election.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 3, § 1.

11.220.
Purpose, intent of gubernatorial transition law.

The General Assembly declares it to be the purpose of KRS

11.210

to

11.260

to promote the orderly transfer of the executive power in connection with the expiration of the term of office of a governor and the inauguration of a new governor. The interest of the Commonwealth requires that such transitions be accomplished so as to assure continuity in the conduct of the affairs of the state government. Any disruption occasioned by the transfer of the executive power could produce results detrimental to the safety and well-being of the Commonwealth and its people. Accordingly, it is the intent of the General Assembly that appropriate actions be authorized and taken to avoid or minimize any disruption. In addition to the specific provisions contained in KRS

11.210

to

11.260

directed toward that purpose, it is the intent of the General Assembly that all officers of the state government so conduct the affairs of the state government for which they exercise responsibility and authority as to be mindful of problems occasioned by transitions in the office of Governor, to take appropriate lawful steps to avoid or minimize disruptions that might be occasioned by the transfer of the executive power and otherwise to promote orderly transitions in the office of Governor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 3, § 2.

11.230.
Facilities for Governor-elect.

The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet is authorized to provide, upon request, to each Governor-elect, for use in connection with his preparations for the assumption of official duties as Governor, necessary services and facilities, including suitable office space appropriately equipped with furniture, and office supplies as determined by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet after consultation with the Governor-elect, within the State Capitol complex.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 3, § 3; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(2).

11.240.
Duty of outgoing Governor.

It shall be incumbent upon the outgoing Governor to direct that all official documents, vital information and procedural manuals shall be given to the Governor-elect upon request.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 3, § 4.

11.250.
Participation by Governor-elect in executive branch and Transportation Cabinet budget recommendations.

The Governor-elect or a delegate appointed by him or her shall be entitled to examine the budget recommendations of the executive branch of government, and the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall provide him or her with every practicable facility for reviewing and familiarizing himself or herself with the recommendations. The Governor-elect shall be entitled to a seat in all hearings thereon. He or she shall be furnished a copy of the budget request of each executive branch budget unit. The budget director shall make available to the Governor-elect so much as he or she requests of the information upon which the executive branch budget recommendations are based.

After a review of the executive branch and Transportation Cabinet draft budget bills, the Governor-elect may prepare revisions and additions thereto. The budget director shall assist, upon request, in the preparation of such revisions and additions.

The budget director shall have as many copies of the revised budget recommendations of the executive branch of government printed as the Governor-elect requests.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 3, § 5; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1); 1982, ch. 450, § 50, effective July 1, 1983; 1990, ch. 507, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 2009, ch. 78, § 24, effective June 25, 2009.

11.260.
Expenses of transition.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall bear all necessary expenses for carrying out the purposes of KRS

11.210

to

11.260

. The Governor shall include in the budget transmitted to the General Assembly, for each fiscal year in which his regular term of office will expire, a proposed appropriation for carrying out the provisions of KRS

11.210

to

11.260

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 3, § 6; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1).